Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-382
Public gatherings; protest; enjoin; grounds.

Whenever fifty or more residents of a county file a written protest with the county board of such county in which they contend that a proposed public exhibition, public entertainment, or public gathering will adversely affect the public health or welfare, or may adversely affect the health and welfare of those in attendance at such public exhibition, public entertainment, or public gathering the county board may set such protest for hearing, and if the board thereafter determines that such exhibition, entertainment, or gathering will apparently have an adverse effect on the public health and welfare or the health and welfare of those in attendance, it shall forthwith cause an action to be brought in the appropriate court to restrain and enjoin such public exhibition, entertainment, or gathering. The court may restrain and permanently enjoin, where the facts indicate the necessity for such action on the basis of the public health and welfare, or, in the alternative, may impose such conditions on the holding of such exhibition, entertainment, or gathering, including the giving of a bond, as will adequately protect the public health and welfare or the health and welfare of those in attendance. The county board shall give such advance notice of the protest and of its hearing thereon as may be reasonable under the circumstances of the particular case, and the notice shall be given by the posting thereof at or immediately adjacent to the premises where such exhibition, entertainment, or gathering is to be held, and it may give such additional notice by publication, or by personal service or service by registered or certified mail on the owner, lessee, or occupant of the premises, or the promoter of such gathering or his agent, as the county board in its judgment may deem feasible.

Laws 1971, LB 63, § 1.